Utah statutes.
58-20a-305.   Exemptions from licensure.

In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, a person is exempt from the licensure requirements of this chapter if:

(1)  the person's practice of environmental health science is limited to inspecting in order to enforce compliance with an inspection and maintenance program established pursuant to Section 41-6a-1642 or to issuing permits under that program;

(2)  the person is a laboratory staff person employed by the Department of Agriculture and Food or the Department of Health, and in his employment inspects, permits, certifies, or otherwise enforces laboratory standards in laboratories regulated by state or local public health laws; or

(3)  the person is the local health officer of a local public health department which employs a director of environmental health services licensed under this chapter.

